Nebraska, session 109, LB869.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB869 LB869
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 69-1311, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
69-1311 (a) The State Treasurer shall annually cause notice to be
published once in each an English language legal newspaper of general
circulation in each county in this state in which is located the last-
known address of any person to be named in the notice. If no address is
known, then the notice shall be published in a legal newspaper having
statewide circulation.
(b) The published notice shall be entitled Notice to Owners of
Abandoned Property and shall contain:
(1)(i) (1) The names in alphabetical order and counties of last-
known addresses, if any, of persons listed in the report and entitled to
notice or (ii) a display ad that covers at least twenty-five percent of a
standard broadsheet and includes a description of how to search for
unclaimed property as provided in subsection (a) of this section.
(2) A statement that information concerning the amount or
description of the property and the name and address of the holder may be
obtained by any person possessing an interest in the property by
addressing an inquiry to the State Treasurer.
(c) The State Treasurer is not required to publish in such notice
any item of less than fifty dollars unless the State Treasurer he or she
deems such publication to be in the public interest.
(d) Within one hundred twenty days from the receipt of the report
required by section 69-1310, the State Treasurer shall mail a notice to
each person having an address listed therein who appears to be entitled
to property of the value of fifty dollars or more presumed abandoned
under the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act.
(e) The mailed notice shall contain:
(1) A statement that, according to a report filed with the State
Treasurer, property is being held to which the addressee appears
entitled.
-2-

LB869 LB869
2026 2026
(2) The name and address of the person holding the property and any
necessary information regarding changes of name and address of the
holder.
(3) A statement that, if satisfactory proof of claim is presented by
the owner to the State Treasurer, arrangements will be made to transfer
the property to the owner as provided by law.
(f) This section is not applicable to sums payable on traveler's
checks or money orders presumed abandoned under section 69-1302.
Sec. 2. Original section 69-1311, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-3-